Connecticut, session 2026, SB00346.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 31-3i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Pursuant to [Section 101 of the federal Workforce Innovation and
Opportunity Act of 2014, P.L. 113-128] 29 USC 3111, as amended from
time to time, the members of the Governor's Workforce Council shall be:
(1) The Governor;
(2) A member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the
speaker of the House of Representatives, and a member of the Senate,
appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) [Twenty-four] Thirty members, appointed by the Governor, who
(A) are owners of a business, chief executives or operating officers of a
business, or other business executives or employers with optimum
policy-making or hiring authority; (B) represent businesses or
organizations representing businesses that provide employment
opportunities that, at a minimum, include high-quality, work-relevant
training and development in in-demand industry sectors or occupation

Senate Bill No. 346
in the state; [or] and (C) have been nominated by state business
organizations or business trade associations. At a minimum, at least one
such member shall represent small businesses, as defined by the United
States Small Business Administration, at least one such member shall be
an expert in residential construction and at least one such member shall
be an expert in unionized construction;
(4) The Labor Commissioner, Commissioner of Aging and Disability
Services, Commissioner of Education, Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development and the Chief Workforce Officer, or their
respective designees;
(5) Four representatives of labor organizations, who have been
nominated by state labor federations and appointed by the Governor;
(6) An individual, appointed by the Governor, who is a member of a
labor organization or a training director from a joint labor-management
apprenticeship program, or, if no such joint program exists in the state,
such a representative of an apprenticeship program in the state;
(7) [An individual, appointed by the Governor, who is an expert in
residential construction] A director of a vocational rehabilitation
program within the Department of Aging and Disability Services,
appointed by the Governor;
(8) Five members, appointed by the Governor, who represent
community-based organizations that have demonstrated experience
and expertise in addressing employment, training, or education,
including one representative of a community action agency, as defined
in section 17b-885, and one representative of a philanthropic
organization;
(9) A representative from the Connecticut State Colleges and
Universities, a representative from The University of Connecticut and a
representative from a nonprofit institution of higher education in the
Public Act No. 26-99 2 of 4

Senate Bill No. 346
state, each appointed by the Governor;
(10) A representative from a regional vocational-technical school and
a representative from a regional agricultural science and technology
school, each appointed by the Governor;
(11) Two superintendents of a local or regional board of education,
appointed by the Governor;
(12) A certified teacher employed by a local or regional board of
education, appointed by the Governor;
(13) Two chief elected officials of municipalities, appointed by the
Governor; [and]
(14) Two members of the public, who are enrolled in or who have
recently completed a nondegree workforce training program, appointed
by the Governor; and [.]
(15) A representative of a labor organization, who has been
nominated by a state building trades labor organization and appointed
by the Governor.
(b) All appointments shall be made in a manner that reflects the
diversity of the state, including, but not limited to, geographic, gender
identity, racial and ethnic diversity.
(c) The Governor shall appoint the chairperson of the Governor's
Workforce Council from among the members appointed pursuant to
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section. The Chief Workforce
Officer shall serve as the vice-chairperson of the council.
(d) The Governor's Workforce Council may establish an executive
committee composed of members appointed by the chairperson. The
vice-chairperson of the council shall be a member of any such executive
committee. The council may delegate to the executive committee any
Public Act No. 26-99 3 of 4

Senate Bill No. 346
powers of the council except those powers that are required by law to
be exercised by the council. The chairperson may also appoint ad hoc
committees, workgroups or task forces to assist the council as
appropriate, and shall consult with the vice-chairperson and the
legislative members of the council in making appointments to such ad
hoc committees, workgroups or task forces.
(e) Any appointments made to the council prior to October 1, 2021,
shall expire on that date.
(f) The council shall meet not less than once every calendar quarter.
(g) The Governor shall establish bylaws for the council pursuant to
20 CFR 679.110(d), which shall include, but need not be limited to, term
limitations for members and how appointments will be made.
(h) The total number of members on the council shall not be more
than sixty-two members.
(i) Any modifications made to the membership of the council shall
conform with the provisions of 29 USC 3111, as amended from time to
time.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-99 4 of 4